California statutes. Penal Code
When an application is made to the Governor for pardon or commutation of sentence, or when an application has been referred to the Board of Parole Hearings, the Governor or the board may require the judge of the court before which the conviction was had, or the district attorney by whom the action was prosecuted, to furnish the Governor or the board, without delay, with a summarized statement of the facts proved on the trial, and of any other facts having reference to the propriety of granting or refusing said application, together with his or her recommendation for or against the granting of the same and his or her reason for such recommendation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 437, Sec. 3.   (AB 648)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.

At least 10 days before the Governor acts upon an application for a pardon, written notice of the intention to apply therefor, signed by the person applying, must be served upon the district attorney of the county where the conviction was had, and proof, by affidavit, of the service must be presented to the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

4805.

(a) At least 10 days before the Governor acts upon an application for a commutation of sentence, written notice of the intention to apply therefor, signed by the person applying, shall be served upon the district attorney of the county where the conviction was had, and proof, by affidavit, of the service shall be presented to the Governor.

(b) The district attorney may submit a written recommendation to the Governor for or against commutation of sentence.

(c) The district attorney shall make reasonable efforts to notify the victim or victims of the crime or crimes related to the application and the victims’ families who may also submit a
 recommendation to the Governor for or against commutation of sentence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 437, Sec. 4.   (AB 648)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4806.

The provisions of Sections 4804 and 4805 are not applicable:

(a) When there is imminent danger of the death of the person convicted or imprisoned.

(b) When the term of imprisonment of the applicant is within 10 days of its expiration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 437, Sec. 5.   (AB 648)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4807.

(a) At the beginning of every regular session of the Legislature, the Governor shall file a written report with the Legislature that shall include each application that was granted for each case of reprieve, pardon, or commutation by the Governor, or his or her predecessor in office, during the immediately preceding regular session of the Legislature, stating the name of the person convicted, the crime of which the person was convicted, the sentence and its date, the date of the reprieve, pardon, or commutation, and the reason for granting the same. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the written report filed with the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available to the
 public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 133.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4807.2.

Every application for pardon or commutation of sentence shall be accompanied by a full statement of any compensation being paid to any person for procuring or assisting in procuring the pardon or commutation or the pardon or commutation shall be denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 943.)
-------------------------------------------

4807.3.

Every person who receives or agrees to receive any compensation or who receives any gift for procuring or assisting in procuring a pardon or commutation of sentence for any applicant must file with the Governor a full statement of the amount and character of such compensation or gift within 10 days of the receipt thereof. Any failure to file a full statement as required by this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 943.)
-------------------------------------------

4810.

(a) The Board of Parole Hearings shall succeed to and shall exercise and perform all powers and duties granted to and imposed upon the Advisory Pardon Board by law.

(b) The Advisory Pardon Board is abolished.

(c) The report required of the Board of Parole Hearings by Section 4814 may be included in the report of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 437, Sec. 7.   (AB 648)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4812.

(a) Upon request of the Governor, the Board of Parole Hearings shall investigate and report on all applications for reprieves, pardons, and commutations of sentence and shall make such recommendations to the Governor with reference thereto as it may seem advisable. To that end, the board shall examine and consider all applications so referred and all transcripts of judicial proceedings and all affidavits or other documents submitted in connection therewith, and shall have power to employ assistants and take testimony and to examine witnesses under oath and to do any
 and all things necessary to make a full and complete investigation of and concerning all applications referred to it. Members of the board and its administrative officer are, and each of them is, hereby authorized to administer oaths.

(b) The board may make recommendations to the Governor at any time regarding applications for pardon or commutation, and the Governor may request investigation into candidates for pardon or commutation at any time.

(c) If a petitioner indicates in the application an urgent need for the pardon or commutation, including, but not limited to, a pending deportation order or deportation proceeding, then the board shall consider expedited review of the application.

(d) The board shall provide electronic
 or written notification to an applicant after the board receives the application, and when the board has issued a recommendation on the application. Nothing in this section requires the board to notify the applicant as to the reasons for the board’s recommendation, which shall remain confidential.

(e) An applicant is eligible for a pardon, commutation, or certificate of rehabilitation without regard to his or her immigration status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 824, Sec. 4.   (AB 2845)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4813.

In the case of applications of persons twice convicted of a felony, the Board of Parole Hearings, after investigation, shall transmit its written recommendation upon such application to the Governor, together with all papers filed in connection with the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 437, Sec. 9.   (AB 648)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Duties of Supreme Court [4850. - 4852.]

4850.

An application that has not received a recommendation from the Board of Parole Hearings favorable to the applicant shall not
 be forwarded to the
 Clerk/Executive Officer of the Supreme Court, unless the Governor, notwithstanding the fact that the board has failed to make a recommendation favorable to the applicant, especially refers an application to the justices for their recommendation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 36, Sec. 18.   (AB 452)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4851.

In all cases where the Board of Parole Hearings has made a recommendation favorable to the applicant and in those cases referred by the Governor, notwithstanding an adverse recommendation, the application, together with all papers and documents relied upon in support of and in opposition to the application, including prison records and recommendation of the Board of Prison Terms, shall be forwarded to the Clerk/Executive Officer
 of the Supreme Court for consideration of the justices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 36, Sec. 19.   (AB 452)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.

If a majority of the justices recommend that clemency be granted, the Clerk/Executive Officer of the Supreme Court shall transmit the application, together with all papers and documents filed in the case, to the Governor; otherwise the documents shall remain in the files of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 36, Sec. 20.   (AB 452)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Procedure for Restoration of Rights and Application for Pardon [4852.01. - 4852.22.]

4852.01.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), a person convicted of a felony may file a petition for a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(b) A person convicted of a
 misdemeanor violation of any sex offense specified in Section 290, or a felony violation of any sex offense specified in Section 290 who is granted probation, the accusatory pleading of which has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, may file a petition for certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the petitioner has not been incarcerated in a prison, jail, detention facility, or other penal institution or agency since the dismissal of the accusatory pleading, is not on probation for the commission of any other felony, and the petitioner presents satisfactory evidence of five years’ residence in this state prior to the filing of the petition.

(c) This chapter does not apply to persons serving a mandatory life parole, persons committed under death sentences, persons
 convicted of a violation of Section 269, subdivision (c) of Section 286, subdivision (c) of Section 287, Section 288, Section 288.5, Section 288.7, subdivision (j) of Section 289, or subdivision (c) of former Section 288a, or persons in military service.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the Governor has the right to pardon a person convicted of a violation of Section 269, subdivision (c) of Section 286, subdivision (c) of Section 287, Section 288, Section 288.5, Section 288.7, subdivision (j) of Section 289, or subdivision (c) of former Section 288a, if there are extraordinary circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 766, Sec. 1.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.03.

(a) The period of rehabilitation commences upon the discharge of the petitioner from custody due to his or her completion of the term to which he or she was sentenced or upon his or her release on parole, postrelease community supervision, mandatory supervision, or probation, whichever is sooner. For purposes of this chapter, the period of rehabilitation shall constitute five years’ residence in this state, plus a period of time determined by the following rules:

(1) An additional four years in the case of a person convicted of violating Section 187, 209, 219, 4500, or 18755 of this code, or subdivision (a) of Section 1672 of the Military and Veterans Code, or of
 committing any other offense which carries a life sentence.

(2) (A) An additional five years in the case of a person convicted of committing an offense or attempted offense for which sex offender registration is required pursuant to Sections 290 to 290.024, inclusive.

(B) A certificate of rehabilitation issued on or after July 1, 2021, does not relieve a person of the obligation to register as a sex offender unless the person obtains relief granted under Section 290.5.

(3) An additional two years in the case of a person
 convicted of committing an offense that is not listed in paragraph (1) or (2) and that does not carry a life sentence.

(4) The trial court hearing the application for the certificate of rehabilitation may, if the defendant was ordered to serve consecutive sentences, order that the statutory period of rehabilitation be extended for an additional period of time which when combined with the time already served will not exceed the period prescribed by statute for the sum of the maximum penalties for all the crimes.

(b) Unless and until the period of rehabilitation required by subdivision (a) has passed, the petitioner shall be ineligible to file his or her petition for a certificate of rehabilitation with the court. A certificate of rehabilitation that is issued and under which the petitioner
 has not fulfilled the requirements of this chapter shall be void.

(c) A change of residence within this state does not interrupt the period of rehabilitation prescribed by this section.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   (SB 384)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.04.

Each person who may initiate the proceedings provided for in this chapter shall be entitled to receive counsel and assistance from all rehabilitative agencies, including the adult probation officer of the county and all state parole officers, and, in the case of persons under 30 years of age, from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 378, Sec. 8.   (AB 1156)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.05.

The person shall live an honest and upright life, shall conduct himself or herself with sobriety and industry, shall exhibit a good moral character, and shall conform to and obey the laws of the land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 981, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.06.

After the expiration of the minimum period of rehabilitation a person who has complied with the requirements of Section 4852.05 may file in the superior court of the county in which he or she then resides or in which he or she was convicted of a felony or of a crime the accusatory pleading of which was dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, a petition for ascertainment and declaration of the fact of his or her rehabilitation and of matters incident thereto, and for a certificate of rehabilitation under this chapter. A petition shall not be filed until and unless the petitioner has continuously resided in this state, after leaving prison or jail, for a period of not less than five years immediately preceding the date of filing the
 petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 824, Sec. 5.   (AB 2845)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.07.

The petitioner shall give notice of the filing and the time of the hearing of the petition at least 30 days before the date set for the hearing to the district attorney of the county in which the petition is filed and to the district attorney of each county in which the petitioner was convicted of a felony or of a crime the accusatory pleading of which was dismissed pursuant to Section
 1203.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 49, Sec. 9.   (AB 168)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.08.

During the proceedings upon the petition, the petitioner may be represented by counsel of his or her own selection. If the petitioner does not have counsel, he or she shall be represented by the public defender, if there is one in the county, and if there is none, by the adult probation officer of the county, or if in the opinion of the court the petitioner needs counsel, the court shall assign counsel to represent him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 402.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.09.

No filing fee nor court fees of any kind shall be required of a petitioner in proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 400.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.1.

(a) The court in which the petition is filed may require testimony as it deems necessary, and the production, for the use of the court and without expense of any kind to the petitioner, of all records and reports relating to the petitioner and the crime of which he or she was convicted, including the following:

(1) The record of the trial.

(2) The report of the probation officer, if any.

(3) The records of the prison, jail, detention facility, or other penal institution from which the petitioner has been released showing his or her conduct during the time
 he or she was there, including the records of the penal institution, jail, or agency doctor and psychiatrist.

(4) The records of the parole officer concerning the petitioner if the petitioner was released on parole, records of the probation officer concerning the petitioner if the petitioner was released on postrelease community supervision or mandatory supervision, or the records of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities concerning the petitioner if the petitioner had been committed to that authority.

(5) The written reports or records of any other law enforcement agency concerning the conduct of the petitioner since the petitioner’s release on probation, parole, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision, or discharge from custody.

(b) A person having
 custody of any of the records described in subdivision (a) shall make them available for the use of the court in the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 378, Sec. 10.   (AB 1156)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.11.

A peace officer shall report to the court, upon receiving a request as provided in Section 4852.1, all known violations of law committed by the petitioner. Upon receiving satisfactory proof of a violation the court may deny the petition and determine a new period of rehabilitation not to exceed the original period of rehabilitation for the same crime. In that event, before granting the petition, the court may require the petitioner to fulfill all the requirements provided to be fulfilled before the granting of the certificate under the original petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 403.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.12.

(a) In a proceeding for the ascertainment and declaration of the fact of rehabilitation under this chapter, the court, upon the filing of the application for petition of rehabilitation, may request from the district attorney an investigation of the residence of the petitioner, the criminal record of the petitioner as shown by the records of the Department of Justice, any representation made to the court by the applicant, the conduct of the petitioner during the period of rehabilitation, including all matters mentioned in Section 4852.11, and any other information the court deems necessary in making its determination. The district attorney shall, upon request of the court, provide the court with a full and complete report of the
 investigations.

(b) In any proceeding for the ascertainment and declaration of the fact of rehabilitation under this chapter of a person convicted of a crime the accusatory pleading of which has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, the district attorney, upon request of the court, shall deliver to the court the criminal record of petitioner as shown by the records of the Department of Justice. The district attorney may investigate any representation made to the court by petitioner and may file with the court a report of the investigation including all matters known to the district attorney relating to the conduct of the petitioner, the place and duration of residence of the petitioner during the period of rehabilitation, and all known violations of law committed by the petitioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 404.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.13.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), if after hearing, the court finds that the petitioner has demonstrated by his or her course of conduct his or her rehabilitation and his or her fitness to exercise all of the civil and political rights of citizenship, the court may make an order declaring that the petitioner has been rehabilitated, and recommending that the Governor grant a full pardon to the petitioner. This order shall be filed with the clerk of the court, and shall be known as a certificate of rehabilitation.

(b) No certificate of rehabilitation shall be granted to a person convicted of any offense specified in Section 290 if the court determines that the petitioner presents a continuing threat to minors of committing any of the offenses specified in Section 290.

(c) A district attorney in either the county where the conviction was obtained or the county of residence of the recipient of the certificate of rehabilitation may petition the superior court to rescind a certificate if it was granted for any offense specified in Section 290. The petition shall be filed in either the county in which the person who has received the certificate of rehabilitation resides or the county in which the conviction was obtained. If the superior court finds that petitioner has demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that the person who has received the certificate presents a continuing threat to minors of committing any of the offenses specified in Section 290, the court shall rescind the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 981, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.14.

The clerk of the court shall immediately transmit certified copies of the certificate of rehabilitation to the Governor, to the Board of Parole Hearings and the Department of Justice, and, in the case of persons twice convicted of a felony, to the Supreme Court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 405.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.15.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge or impair the power or authority conferred by law on any officer, board, or tribunal to revoke or suspend any right, privilege, or franchise for any act or omission not involved in his or her conviction, or to require the reinstatement of the right or privilege to practice or carry on any profession or occupation the practice or conduct of which requires the possession or obtaining of a license, permit, or certificate. Nothing in this chapter shall affect any provision of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code or the power or authority conferred by law on the Board of Medical Examiners therein, or the power or authority conferred by law upon any board that issues a certificate permitting any person to practice or apply his or her art or profession on the person of another. Nothing in this chapter shall affect any provision of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or the power or authority in relation to attorneys at law and the practice of the law in the State of California conferred by law upon or otherwise possessed by the courts, or the power or authority conferred by law upon the State Bar of California or any board or committee thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 141.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.16.

(a) The certified copy of a certificate of rehabilitation transmitted to the Governor shall constitute an application for a full pardon upon receipt of which the Governor may, without any further investigation, issue a pardon to the person named therein, except that, pursuant to Section 8 of Article V of the Constitution, the Governor shall not grant a pardon to any person twice convicted of felony, except upon the written recommendation of a majority of the judges of the Supreme Court.

(b) Subject to criteria established by the Governor, a certificate of rehabilitation issued by a court shall be reviewed by the Board of Parole Hearings within one year
 of receipt of the certificate, which shall issue a recommendation as to whether the Governor should pardon that individual. Any criteria established by the Governor shall be made publicly available, but shall be otherwise exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 824, Sec. 6.   (AB 2845)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.17.

Whenever a person is issued a certificate of rehabilitation or granted a pardon from the Governor under this chapter, the fact shall be immediately reported to the Department of Justice by the court, Governor, officer, or governmental agency by whose official action the certificate is issued or the pardon granted. The Department of Justice shall immediately record the facts so reported on the former criminal record of the person, and transmit those facts to the Federal Bureau of Investigation at Washington, D.C. When the criminal record is thereafter reported by the department, it shall also report the fact that the person has received a certificate of rehabilitation, or pardon, or both.

Whenever a person is granted a full and unconditional pardon by the Governor,
 based upon a certificate of rehabilitation, the pardon shall entitle the person to exercise thereafter all civil and political rights of citizenship, including, but not limited to: (1) the right to vote; (2) the right to own, possess, and keep any type of firearm that may lawfully be owned and possessed by other citizens; except that this right shall not be restored, and Sections 17800 and 23510 and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6 shall apply, if the person was ever convicted of a felony involving the use of a dangerous weapon.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 85) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 218.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.18.

The Board of Parole Hearings shall furnish to the clerk of the superior court of each county a set of sample forms for a petition for certificate of rehabilitation and pardon, a notice of filing of petition for certificate of rehabilitation and pardon, and a certificate of rehabilitation. The clerk of the court shall have a sufficient number of these forms printed to meet the needs of the people of the county, shall post these forms on the court’s Internet Web site, and shall make these forms available at no charge to persons requesting them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 824, Sec. 7.   (AB 2845)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.19.

This chapter shall be construed as providing an additional, but not an exclusive, procedure for the restoration of rights and application for pardon. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as repealing any other provision of law providing for restoration of rights or application for pardon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 400.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.2.

Every person, other than an individual who is licensed to practice law in the State of California, pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6060) of Chapter 4 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and who is acting in that capacity, who solicits or accepts any fee, money, or anything of value for his or her services, or his or her purported services, in representing a petitioner in any proceeding under this chapter, or in any application to the Governor for a pardon under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 632, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.21.

(a) A person to whom this chapter applies shall, prior to discharge or release on parole or postrelease community supervision from a state prison or other state penal institution or agency, or prior to discharge or release on mandatory supervision from a county jail, be informed in writing by the official in charge of the place of confinement of the person’s right to petition for, and of the procedure for filing the petition for and obtaining, a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Prior to dismissal of the accusatory pleading pursuant to Section 1203.4, the defendant shall be informed in writing by the clerk of the court dismissing the accusatory
 pleading of the defendant’s right, if any, to petition for, and of the procedure for filing a petition for and obtaining, a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 378, Sec. 11.   (AB 1156)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4852.22.

Except in a case requiring registration pursuant to Section 290, a trial court hearing an application for a certificate of rehabilitation before the applicable period of rehabilitation has elapsed may grant the application if the court, in its discretion, believes relief serves the interests of justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 721, Sec. 2.   (SB 530)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Effect of Full Pardon [4853. - 4854.]

4853.

In all cases in which a full pardon has been granted by the Governor of this state or will hereafter be granted by the Governor to a person convicted of an offense to which the pardon applies, it shall operate to restore to the convicted person, all the rights, privileges, and franchises of which he or she has been deprived in consequence of that conviction or by reason of any matter involved therein; provided, that nothing herein contained shall abridge or impair the power or authority conferred by law on any board or tribunal to revoke or suspend any right, privilege or franchise for any act or omission not involved in the conviction; provided further, that nothing in this article shall affect any of the provisions of the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code) or the power or authority conferred by law on the Board of Medical Examiners therein, or the power or authority conferred by law upon any board that issues a certificate which permits any person or persons to apply his or her or their art or profession on the person of another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 143.)
-------------------------------------------

4854.

In the granting of a pardon to a person, the Governor may provide that the person is entitled to exercise the right to own, possess, and keep any type of firearm that may lawfully be owned and possessed by other citizens; except that this right shall not be restored, and Sections 17800 and 23510 and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6 shall apply, if the person was ever convicted of a felony involving the use of a dangerous weapon.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 86) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 219.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Indemnity for Persons Erroneously Convicted and Pardoned [4900. - 4906.]

4900.

(a) Any person who, having been convicted of any crime against the state amounting to a felony and imprisoned in the state prison or incarcerated in county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for that conviction, is granted a pardon by the Governor for the reason that the crime with which they were charged was either not committed at all or, if committed, was not committed by the person, or who, being innocent of the crime with which they were charged for either of those reasons, shall have served the term or any part thereof for which they were imprisoned in state prison or incarcerated in county jail, may, under the conditions provided under this chapter, present a claim against the state to the California Victim Compensation Board for the injury sustained by the person through the erroneous conviction and
 imprisonment or incarceration.

(b) If a state or federal court has granted a writ of habeas corpus or if a state court has granted a motion to vacate pursuant to Section 1473.6 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1473.7, and the charges were subsequently dismissed, or the person was acquitted of the charges on a retrial, the California Victim Compensation Board shall, upon application by the person, and without a hearing, approve payment to the claimant if sufficient funds are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, pursuant to Section 4904, unless the Attorney General establishes pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4902, that the claimant is not entitled to compensation.

(c) (1) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024, only if General Fund
 moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and an appropriation is made to backfill the Restitution Fund to support the actions in this section. If those conditions are met, this section is repealed January 1, 2025.

(2) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 771, Sec. 18.   (AB 160)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative July 1, 2024, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Conditionally repealed January 1, 2025, as prescribed by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 19 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 771.)
-------------------------------------------

4900.

(a) Any person who, having been convicted of any crime against the state amounting to a felony, and imprisoned in the state prison or incarcerated in county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for that conviction, is granted a pardon by the Governor for the reason that the crime with which they were charged was either not committed at all or, if committed, was not committed by the person, or who, being innocent of the crime with which they were charged for either of those reasons, has served the term or any part thereof for which they were imprisoned in state prison, incarcerated in county jail, on parole, or under supervised release, may, under the conditions provided under this chapter, present a claim against the state to the California Victim Compensation Board for the injury sustained by
 the person through the erroneous conviction and imprisonment or incarceration.

(b) If a state or federal court has granted a writ of habeas corpus or if a state court has granted a motion to vacate pursuant to Section 1473.6 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1473.7, and the charges were subsequently dismissed, or the person was acquitted of the charges on a retrial, the California Victim Compensation Board shall, upon application by the person, and without a hearing, approve payment to the claimant if sufficient funds are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, pursuant to Section 4904, unless the Attorney General establishes pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4902, that the claimant is not entitled to compensation.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25
 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if an appropriation is made to backfill the Restitution Fund to support the actions in this section.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 18) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 771, Sec. 19.   (AB 160)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Conditionally operative July 1, 2024, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.

(a) A claim under Section 4900, accompanied by a statement of the facts constituting the claim, verified in the manner provided for the verification of complaints in civil actions, is required to be presented by the claimant to the California Victim Compensation Board within a period of 10 years after judgment of acquittal, dismissal of charges, pardon granted, or release from custody, whichever is later.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “release from custody” means release from imprisonment from state prison or from incarceration in county jail when there is no subsequent parole jurisdiction exercised by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or postrelease jurisdiction under
 a community
 corrections program, or when there is a parole period or postrelease period subject to jurisdiction of a community corrections program, when that period ends.

(c) A person may not file a claim under Section 4900 until 60 days have passed since the date of reversal of conviction or granting of the writ, or while the case is pending upon an initial refiling, or until a complaint or information has been dismissed a single time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 473, Sec. 2.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4902.

(a) If the provisions of Section 851.865 or 1485.55 apply in any claim, the California Victim Compensation Board shall, within 90 days of the filing of the claim, calculate the compensation for the claimant pursuant to Section 4904 and approve payment to the claimant if sufficient funds are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature. As to any claim to which Section 851.865 or 1485.55
 does not apply, the Attorney General shall respond to the claim within 60 days or request an extension of time, upon a showing of good cause.

(b) Upon receipt of a response from the Attorney General, the board shall fix a time and place for the hearing of the claim, and shall mail notice thereof to the claimant and to the Attorney General at least 15 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. The board shall use reasonable diligence in setting the date for the hearing and shall attempt to set the date for the hearing at the earliest date convenient for the parties and the board.

(c) If the time period for response elapses without a request for extension or a response from the Attorney General pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall fix a time and place for the hearing of
 the claim, mail notice thereof to the claimant at least 15 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing, and make a decision based on the claimant’s verified claim and any evidence presented by the claimant.

(d) If subdivision (b) of Section 4900 applies in any claim, the California Victim Compensation Board shall calculate the compensation for the claimant pursuant to Section 4904 and approve payment to the claimant if sufficient funds are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, unless the Attorney General objects in writing, within 45 days from when the claimant files the claim, with clear and convincing evidence that the claimant is not entitled